Illinois, session 104th, HB2752.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 22B-117 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/22B-117)7    Sec. 22B-117. Meetings of the board.8    (a) The transition board and the permanent board shall 9each meet at least quarterly and otherwise upon written 10request of either the Chairperson or 3 other members. The 11Chairperson shall preside over meetings of the board. The 12executive director and personnel of the board shall prepare 13agendas and materials and required postings for meetings of 14the board.15    (b) Six members of the board shall constitute a quorum.16    (c) All actions taken by the transition board and the 17permanent board shall require a vote of least 5 trustees, 18except that the following shall require a vote of at least 6 19trustees: the adoption of actuarial assumptions; the selection 20of the chief investment officer, fiduciary counsel, or a 21consultant as defined under Section 1-101.5 of this Code; the 22adoption of rules for the conduct of election of trustees; and 23the adoption of asset allocation policies and investment   HB2752- 2 -LRB104 07850 RPS 17896 b1policies. 2    (d) Subject to the requirements of Section 2.06 of the 3Open Meetings Act but notwithstanding any other provision of 4law, meetings of committees of the board may be conducted by 5audio or video conference, without the physical presence of a 6quorum of the members, so long as the following conditions are 7met:8        (1) The chairperson of the board determines that an 9    in-person meeting would pose a risk to the health or 10    safety of members of the board or the public and that 11    conducting a meeting by an audio or video conference is in 12    the best interest of the board and the public, and the 13    public notice of any meeting given under this paragraph 14    (1) states the reason or reasons for such determination.15        (2) All members of the board participating in the 16    meeting, wherever their physical location, shall be 17    verified and can hear one another and can hear all 18    discussion and testimony.19        (3) For open meetings, members of the public present 20    at the meeting location of the committee of the board can 21    hear all discussion and testimony and all votes of the 22    members of the committee of the board, or the committee of 23    the board makes arrangements and provides notice pursuant 24    to this subsection (d) of such arrangements in a manner to 25    allow any interested member of the public access to 26    contemporaneously hear all discussion, testimony, and roll   HB2752- 3 -LRB104 07850 RPS 17896 b1    call votes, such as by offering a telephone number or a 2    web-based link, and to provide a method and notice by 3    which members of the public may provide public comment or 4    address the committee of the board as authorized by 5    subsection (g) of Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act, 6    such as by telephone or web-based link, or by email or 7    written comment to be read aloud at the meeting, 8    consistent with the board's established and recorded rules 9    for public comment, and to be included in the meeting 10    record.11        (4) At least one member of the board, its legal 12    counsel, or an administrative officer of the board is 13    physically present at the meeting location.14        (5) All votes are conducted by roll call, and each 15    member's vote on each issue is identified and recorded.16        (6) Except in the event of a bona fide emergency, 48 17    hours' notice shall be given of a meeting to be held 18    pursuant to this Section. Notice shall be given to all 19    members of the board, shall be posted in compliance with 20    subsection (a) of Section 2.02 of the Open Meetings Act, 21    and shall also be provided to any news media that has 22    requested notice of meetings pursuant to subsection (a) of 23    Section 2.02 of the Open Meetings Act. The meeting notice 24    and agenda shall include the following: (i) all 25    information necessary for the public to access the audio 26    or video conference, including, but not limited to, the   HB2752- 4 -LRB104 07850 RPS 17896 b1    telephone number, web-based link, meeting identification 2    number, passcode, or other method to obtain access; and 3    (ii) for meetings conducted without the public present at 4    the meeting location pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (4) of 5    this subsection (d), all additional specific information 6    necessary for members of the public to provide public 7    comment or address the committee of the board as 8    authorized by subsection (g) of Section 2.06 of the Open 9    Meetings Act, such as by telephone number, web-based link, 10    email, or written comment. If the board declares a bona 11    fide emergency:12            (A) Notice shall be given pursuant to subsection 13        (a) of Section 2.02 of the Open Meetings Act, and the 14        presiding officer shall state the nature of the 15        emergency at the beginning of the meeting.16            (B) The committee of the board must comply with 17        the verbatim recording requirements set forth in 18        Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act.19        (7) Each member of the board participating in a 20    meeting by audio or video conference for a meeting held 21    pursuant to this Section shall be considered present at 22    the meeting for purposes of determining a quorum and 23    participating in all proceedings.24        (8) In addition to the requirements for open meetings 25    under Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act, committees of 26    the board holding open meetings under this subsection (d)   HB2752- 5 -LRB104 07850 RPS 17896 b1    must also keep a verbatim record of all their meetings in 2    the form of an audio or video recording. Verbatim records 3    made under this paragraph (8) shall be made available to 4    the public under, and are otherwise subject to, the 5    provisions of Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act.6        (9) The board shall bear all costs associated with 7    compliance with this subsection (d).8(Source: P.A. 101-610, eff. 1-1-20.)